de: Federungskonfiguration: Vorderradfederung; Vollfederung; Ohne Federung; Hinterradfederung; Sonstige
it: Configurazione della sospensione: Sospensione anteriore; Sospensione completa; Nessuna sospensione; Sospensione posteriore; Altro
sv: Fjädringskonfiguration: Framfjädring; Hel dämpning; Ingen fjädring; Bakfjädring; Övrigt
en: Suspension configuration: Front suspension; Full suspension; No suspension; Rear suspension; Other
ja: サスペンション構成: フロントサスペンション; フルサスペンション; サスペンションなし; リアサスペンション; その他
pt-PT: Configuração da suspensão: Suspensão dianteira; Suspensão total; Sem suspensão; Suspensão traseira; Outro
th: การกำหนดค่าช่วงล่าง: ระบบกันสะเทือนหน้า; ระบบกันสะเทือนเต็มรูปแบบ; ไม่มีระบบกันสะเทือน; ระบบกันสะเทือนหลัง; อื่นๆ
fi: Jousituksen kokoonpano: Etujousitus; Täysjousitus; Ei jousitusta; Takajousitus; Muu
nl: Ophangingsconfiguratie: Voorvering; Volledige vering; Geen vering; Achtervering; Overig
ro-RO: Configurația suspensiei: Suspensie față; Suspensie completă; Fără suspensie; Suspensie spate; Altele
pt-BR: Suspensão configuração: Suspensão dianteira; Suspensão integral; Sem suspensão; Suspensão traseira; Outros
es: Configuración de la suspensión: Suspensión delantera; Suspensión completa; Sin suspensión; Suspensión trasera; Otro
pl: Konfiguracja zawieszenia: Przednie zawieszenie; Pełne zawieszenie; Brak zawieszenia; Tylne zawieszenie; Inna
zh-TW: 避震配置: 前懸吊; 全懸吊; 無懸吊; 後懸吊; 其他
tr: Süspansiyon konfigürasyonu: Ön süspansiyon; Tam süspansiyon; Süspansiyonsuz; Arka süspansiyon; Diğer
fr: Configuration de la suspension: Suspension avant; Suspension intégrale; Sans suspension; Suspension arrière; Autre
nb: Suspensjonskonfigurasjon: Fjæring foran; Full fjæring; Uten fjæring; Fjæring bak; Annet
vi: Cấu hình hệ thống treo: Hệ thống treo trước; Hệ thống treo toàn phần; Không có hệ thống treo; Hệ thống treo sau; Khác
lt-LT: Pakabos konfigūracija: Priekinė pakaba; Pilna pakaba; Be pakabos; Galinė pakaba; Kita
zh-CN: 悬架配置: 前悬架; 全悬架; 无悬架; 后悬架; 其他
bg-BG: Конфигурация на окачването: Предно окачване; Пълно окачване; Без окачване; Задно окачване; Друго
ru: Конфигурация подвески: Передняя подвеска; Полная подвеска; Без подвески; Задняя подвеска; Другое
sl-SI: Konfiguracija vzmetenja: Prednje vzmetenje; Polnovzmeteno; Brez vzmetenja; Zadnje vzmetenje; Drugo
sk-SK: Konfigurácia zavesenia: Predné odpruženie; Celoodpružené; Bez odpruženia; Zadné odpruženie; Iné
da: Affjedringskonfiguration: Affjedring foran; Fuld affjedring; Ingen affjedring; Affjedring bagpå; Andet
el: Διαμόρφωση ανάρτησης: Εμπρόσθια ανάρτηση; Πλήρης ανάρτηση; Χωρίς ανάρτηση; Οπίσθια ανάρτηση; Άλλο
ko: 서스펜션 구성: 전륜 서스펜션; 풀 서스펜션; 서스펜션 없음; 후륜 서스펜션; 기타
hr-HR: Konfiguracija ovjesa: Prednji ovjes; Puni ovjes; Bez ovjesa; Stražnji ovjes; Ostalo
hu: Felfüggesztés-konfiguráció: Első felfüggesztés; Teljes felfüggesztés; Felfüggesztés nélkül; Hátsó felfüggesztés; Egyéb
cs: Konfigurace odpružení: Přední odpružení; Celoodpružené; Bez odpružení; Zadní odpružení; Jiné